Hawaii statutes.
§88-62 Return to service of a former
member. (a) For members who became members before July 1, 2012:

(1) If a former member who has fewer than five years
of credited service and who has been out of service for a period of four full
calendar years or more after the year in which the former member left service,
or if a former member who withdrew the former member's accumulated
contributions returns to service, the former member shall become a member in
the same manner and under the same conditions as anyone first entering service;
however, the former member may obtain membership service credit in the manner
provided by applicable law for credited service that was forfeited by the
member upon termination of the member's previous membership. If the member did
not withdraw the former member's accumulated contributions prior to the former
member's return to service, the accumulated contributions shall be returned to
the member as part of the process of enrolling the member in the system if the
member's accumulated contributions are $1,000 or less at the time of
distribution. If the accumulated contributions for the service the member had
when the member previously terminated employment are greater than $1,000 and
the member does not make written application, prior to or contemporaneously
with the member's return to service, for return of the accumulated
contributions, the member may not withdraw the member's accumulated
contributions, except as provided by section 88-96 or 88-341, until the member
retires or attains age sixty-two. The member shall not be entitled to service
credit by reason of the system's retention of the member's accumulated
contributions for the service the member had when the member previously
terminated employment.

To be eligible for any benefit, the member
shall fulfill the membership service requirements for the benefit through
membership service after again becoming a member, in addition to meeting any
other eligibility requirement established for the benefit; provided that the
membership service requirement shall be exclusive of any former service
acquired in accordance with section 88-59 or any other section in part II, VII,
or VIII;

(2) If a former member with fewer than five years of
credited service and who did not withdraw the former member's accumulated
contributions returns to service within four full calendar years after the year
in which the former member left service, the former member shall again become a
member in the same manner and under the same conditions as anyone first
entering service, except that the member shall be credited with service credit
for the service the member had when the member terminated employment and:

(A) If
the member returns to service as a class A or class B member, the member's new
and previous accumulated contributions shall be combined; or

(B) If
the member returns to service after June 30, 2006, as a class H member, section
88-321(b) shall apply; and

(3) If a former member with five or more years of
credited service who did not withdraw the former member's contributions returns
to service, the former member's status shall be in accordance with the
provisions described in section 88-97.

(b) For members who become members after June
30, 2012:

(1) If a former member who has fewer than ten years
of credited service and who has been out of service for a period of four full
calendar years or more after the year in which the former member left service,
or if a former member who withdrew the former member's accumulated
contributions returns to service, the former member shall become a member in
the same manner and under the same conditions as anyone first entering service;
however, the former member may obtain membership service credit in the manner
provided by applicable law for credited service that was forfeited by the
member upon termination of the member's previous membership. If the member did
not withdraw the former member's accumulated contributions prior to the former
member's return to service, the accumulated contributions shall be returned to
the member as part of the process of enrolling the member in the system if the
member's accumulated contributions are $1,000 or less at the time of
distribution. If the accumulated contributions for the service the member had
when the member previously terminated employment are greater than $1,000 and
the member does not make written application, prior to or contemporaneously
with the member's return to service, for return of the accumulated
contributions, the member may not withdraw the member's accumulated
contributions, except as provided by section 88-96 or 88-341, until the member
retires or attains age sixty-two. The member shall not be entitled to service
credit by reason of the system's retention of the member's accumulated
contributions for the service the member had when the member previously
terminated employment. To be eligible for any benefit, the member shall
fulfill the membership service requirements for the benefit through membership
service after again becoming a member, in addition to meeting any other
eligibility requirement established for the benefit; provided that the
membership service requirement shall be exclusive of any former service
acquired in accordance with section 88-59 or any other section in part II, VII,
or VIII;

(2) If a former member with fewer than ten years of
credited service and who did not withdraw the former member's accumulated
contributions returns to service within four full calendar years after the year
in which the former member left service, the former member shall again become a
member in the same manner and under the same conditions as anyone first
entering service, except that the member shall be credited with service credit
for the service the member had when the member terminated employment:

(A) If the member returns to service as a
class A or class B member, the member's new and previous accumulated
contributions shall be combined; or

(B) If the member returns to service as a
class H member, section 88-321(b) shall apply; and

(3) If a former member with ten or more years of
credited service who did not withdraw the former member's contributions returns
to service, the former member's status shall be in accordance with the
provisions described in section 88-97. [L 1969, c 110, pt of §1; am L 1982, c
165, §2(13); am L 2006, c 169, §9; am L 2007, c 215, §6; am L 2011, c 163, §3]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next